Vermont, session 2025-2026, H359.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 341 is amended to read:
§ 341. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(3) “Privatization contract” means a contract for services valued at
$25,000.00 or more per year, which:
(A) is the same or substantially similar to and in lieu of services
previously currently provided, in whole or in part, by permanent, classified
State employees, and which results in a reduction in force of at least one
permanent, classified employee, or the elimination of a vacant position of an
employee covered by a collective bargaining agreement; or
VT LEG #380564 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.359
2025 Page 2 of 8
(B) will substantially replace the duties of a vacant position in State
government.
* * *
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 342 is amended to read:
§ 342. CONTRACTING STANDARDS; CONTRACTS FOR SERVICES
Each contract for services valued at $25,000.00 or more per year shall
require certification by the Office of the Attorney General to the Secretary of
Administration that such contract for services is not contrary to the spirit and
intent of the classification plan and merit system and standards of this title. A
contract for services is contrary to the spirit and intent of the classification plan
and merit system and standards of this title, and shall not be certified by the
Office of the Attorney General as provided in this section, unless the
provisions of subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this section are met, or one or
more of the exceptions described in subdivision (4) of this section apply.
* * *
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 343 is amended to read:
§ 343. PRIVATIZATION CONTRACTS; PROCEDURE
(a) An agency shall not enter into a privatization contract, unless all of the
following are satisfied:
(1)(A) Thirty-five days prior to the beginning of any open bidding
process, the agency provides written notice to the collective bargaining
VT LEG #380564 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.359
2025 Page 3 of 8
representative of the intent to seek to enter a privatization contract. During
those 35 days, the collective bargaining representative shall have the
opportunity to discuss alternatives to contracting. Such alternatives may
include amendments to the contract if mutually agreed upon by the parties.
Notices regarding the bid opportunity may not be issued during the 35-day
discussion period. The continuation of discussions beyond the end of the 35-
day period shall not delay the issuance of notices.
(B) During the 35-day period, the agency shall prepare a specific written
statement of the services proposed to be the subject of privatization contract,
including the specific quantity and standard or quality of the subject services.
For each position in which a bidder will employ any person pursuant to a
privatization contract and for which the duties are substantially similar to the
duties performed by a permanent, classified State employee, the statement
shall also include the prevailing wage rate to be paid for each position, which
shall not be less than the average step of the grade under which the comparable
State employee position is paid. This statement shall be provided to the
collective bargaining representative, the Agency of Administration, and be
posted to where it is viewable to the public. This statement shall be subject to
1 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 3 (Public Records Act).
* * *
VT LEG #380564 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.359
2025 Page 4 of 8
(4) Every bid for a privatization contract shall include:
(A) the wage rate for each position, which shall not be less than the
prevailing wage rate contained in the statement described in subdivision (1)(B)
of this subsection (a); and
(B) whether health, dental, and vision insurance coverage is provided
to employees and, if applicable, the cost to employees for such coverage.
(5) The Agency and the Secretary of Administration shall each certify in
writing that:
(A) they have complied with all provisions of this section and with
all other applicable laws;
(B) the quality of the services to be provided by the designated bidder
is likely to satisfy the quality requirements of the statement prepared pursuant
to subdivision (1) of this subsection (a);
(C) the designated bidder and its supervisory employees, while in the
employ of the designated bidder, have no record of substantial or repeated
willful noncompliance with any relevant federal or State regulatory statute,
including statutes concerning labor relations, occupational safety and health,
nondiscrimination and affirmative action, environmental protection, and
conflicts of interest; and
(D) the proposed privatization contract is in the public interest in that
it meets the applicable quality and fiscal standards set forth in this section.
VT LEG #380564 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.359
2025 Page 5 of 8
(b) Each privatization contract shall include:
(1) the wage rate for each position, which shall not be less than the
prevailing wage rate contained in the statement described in subdivision (a)(1)
of this section;
(2) a provision that the cost and coverage of the health, dental, and
vision insurance provided to employees is substantially similar to the cost and
coverage of the health, dental, and vision insurance provided to State
employees;
(3) a provision that the contractor shall submit quarterly payroll records
to the agency that list the hours worked and the hourly wage paid for each
employee in the previous quarter;
(4) a provision that the agency shall not amend any privatization
contract if the amendment has the purpose or effect of voiding any requirement
of this section;
(5) a provision requiring the contractor to comply with a policy of
nondiscrimination and equal opportunity for all persons and to take affirmative
steps to provide such equal opportunity for all persons;
(6) a provision granting all employees employed under the contract just
cause employment protection; and
VT LEG #380564 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.359
2025 Page 6 of 8
(7) a provision requiring the contractor to comply with a policy of
whistleblower protection equal to those defined in sections 971–978 of this
title.
(c)(1) A privatization contract shall contain specific performance measures
regarding quantity, quality, and results and guarantees regarding the services
performed.
(2) The agency shall provide information in the State’s Workforce
Report on the contractor’s compliance with the specific performance measures
set out in the contract.
(3) The agency may not renew the contract if the contractor fails to
comply with the specific performance measures set out in the contract as
required by subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(c)(d)(1) Before an agency may renew a privatization contract for the first
time, the Auditor of Accounts shall review the privatization contract, along
with employer payroll and benefits records, analyzing whether it is achieving:
(A) the 10 percent cost-savings requirement set forth in subdivision
(a)(2) of this section; and
(B) the performance measures incorporated into the contract as
required under subdivision (b)(c)(1) of this section.
(2) If the Auditor of Accounts finds that a privatization contract has not
achieved the cost savings required under subdivision (a)(2) of this section or
VT LEG #380564 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.359
2025 Page 7 of 8
complied with performance measures required under subdivision (b)
subdivisions (c)(1) and (d)(1) of this section, the Auditor of Accounts shall file
a report with the agency and the House Committee on Government Operations
and Military Affairs and Senate Committees Committee on Government
Operations, and the agency review whether to renew the privatization contract
or perform the work with State employees shall not renew the privatization
contract.
Sec. 4. FISCAL AND OPERATIONAL IMPACT OF PRIVATIZATION
CONTRACT CHANGES
(a) The Agency of Administration, in consultation with the Joint Fiscal
Office, the State Auditor, the Vermont State Employees’ Association, and the
Office of the Attorney General, shall assess the fiscal and operational impacts
of:
(1) modifying the definition of “privatization contract” as set forth in
3 V.S.A. § 341 to include grants;
(2) increasing the required cost savings of a privatization contract from
10 percent to 20 percent; and
(3) removing exceptions set forth in 3 V.S.A. § 342(4) that, after review,
are used excessively or arbitrarily to certify contracts by the Office of the
Attorney General.
VT LEG #380564 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.359
2025 Page 8 of 8
(b) The Agency shall submit a written report to the House Committees on
Appropriations and on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the
Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Government Operations with its
analysis conducted pursuant to this section on or before February 1, 2026.
Sec. 5. LEGISLATIVE INTENT; PRIVATIZATION CONTRACTS
It is the intent of the General Assembly that a privatization contract shall
not be required for a contract for services when there is no permanent,
classified State employee position to perform the equivalent of such proposed
contracted services, which includes health services and capital construction.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage, except that Sec. 1 shall take effect on
July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380564 v.1